Colorado statutes. TITLE 25.5 Health Care Policy and Financing
PART 1 LONG-TERM CARE ADMINISTRATION
25.5-6-110. Private-public partnership education and information program concerning long-term care insurance authorized.

The general assembly hereby declares that:

A large number of Coloradans are in need of long-term health care;

The cost of long-term care, especially nursing home care, is significant;

Many persons in need of long-term care are ineligible for state medical assistance due to countable resources. When faced with the need for long-term care, such persons expend such resources to pay for nursing home care.

A person's resources may cover only a relatively short period of care, often resulting in rendering such person impoverished, and after which time the person must rely on state medical assistance;

Expenditures for long-term care represent a significant portion of the state's medical assistance budget;

Unless Colorado implements new methods for financing long-term care, which methods include participation by the private sector, the cost to the state for long-term care will increase astronomically; and

It is therefore appropriate to enact legislation that allows the state department, upon a determination by the executive director of the state department that it is feasible, to design and implement a private-public partnership for financing long-term care in this state.

The state department shall cooperate with the division of insurance in the department of regulatory agencies in a private-public partnership for financing long-term care in this state through the availability of long-term care insurance policies that result in a reduction of total dependency on the medical assistance program to finance such care. It is the general assembly's intent that such partnership shall be designed to encourage individuals to purchase long-term care insurance, which, with respect to middle to higher income individuals, will have the result of eliminating or delaying the individual's need for medical assistance.

Under the partnership described in subsection (2) of this section, the division of insurance shall implement statutory changes to article 19 of title 10, C.R.S., concerning long-term care policies that the general assembly hereby declares are necessary to accomplish the purpose of the partnership described in this section. In addition, the state department is encouraged to implement a public education-awareness program based on recommendations from an advisory committee that the executive director of the state department is hereby authorized to establish.

The state department is authorized to seek and accept funds, grants, or donations from any private entity for implementing the public education-awareness program. In addition, if necessary, the state department may assess a fee in connection with conducting any public education-awareness training program or seminar. Any such fee collected shall be transmitted to the state treasurer, who shall credit the same to the long-term care insurance fund, which fund is hereby created. The moneys in the fund shall be subject to annual appropriation by the general assembly for the sole purpose of public education-awareness training programs and seminars.

In addition to administering the public education-awareness program under the partnership, the state department shall seek a federal waiver from the requirement of section 13612 of the federal "Omnibus Budget Reconciliation Act of 1993" (OBRA), Public Law 103-66, that prevents the state department from granting medical assistance applicants a full or partial resource exemption in determining eligibility for medical assistance and an exemption from estate recovery requirements.

The state department, if funds are available, shall contract with a public or private entity to conduct an evaluation of the public education-awareness program on or before December 1, 2000.

With respect to a policyholder who has allowed his or her private long-term care insurance policy to lapse, if the person is found to be eligible for the medical assistance program, the state department is authorized to pay the premium for a reinstated policy pursuant to section 10-19-107 (2), C.R.S., if the state department finds that to do so is feasible and cost-efficient.

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire article added with relocations, p. 1922, § 7, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 26-4-506.7 as it existed prior to 2006.

25.5-6-111. Pilot program for coordinated care for people with a disability - fund - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2006:

Entire section added, p. 1115, § 1, effective May 25.

L. 2013:

(1), (2), (3), (5), (6), and (7) repealed and (4) amended, (SB 13-276), ch. 256, p. 1350, §§ 1, 2, effective May 23.

25.5-6-112. Plan of financial operation - purpose - approval - financial audits - rules - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2007:

Entire section added, p. 1352, § 2, effective May 29.

L. 2013:

Entire section repealed, (SB 13-276), ch. 256, p. 1353, § 10, effective May 23.

25.5-6-113. Health home - integrated services - legislative declaration - contracting - definitions.

The general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The state demography office in the department of local affairs estimates that between 2005 and 2015, the portion of Colorado's population that is over sixty-five years of age will increase by more than twenty-three percent;

This drastic increase in the population that is over sixty-five years of age is driven by the aging "baby boomer" generation and will result in a parallel increase in a demand for community long-term care services;

Older adults, persons with disabilities, and their families need quality health-care coverage and choice and flexibility in accessing community long-term care services that support their independence and ability to live in the least restrictive environment;

Research has shown that older adults suffer from higher rates of depression, have a higher risk of suicide, and have an increased misuse of prescription and illicit drugs, making the need for behavioral health-care services essential to long-term care services;

Coloradans deserve to have access to the proper level of health care;

The state needs a long-term care delivery system that addresses the needs of older adults, persons with disabilities, and their families, and health-care coverage and coordination should not be fragmented or difficult to access; instead, it should be integrated to meet the needs of older adults, persons with disabilities, and their families;

A community long-term care system should be integrated, person-centered, and provide maximum service delivery and make efficient use of available public funds; and

The system must ensure a comprehensive approach to long-term care that addresses the different demographic and geographic challenges in the state and the various long-term care services and supports that clients need.

Therefore, the general assembly declares that a comprehensive approach to long-term care requires that programs and policies integrating and coordinating care under the medicaid program be flexible and allow for full participation by providers of long-term care services to ensure quality of care for clients and efficient use of limited resources.

As used in this section, unless the context otherwise requires:

"Dually eligible person" means a person who is eligible for assistance or benefits under both medicaid and medicare.

"Health home" means a provider or group of providers that operate in coordination with a team of health-care professionals that shall include primary care providers selected by an eligible individual with chronic conditions to provide health home services, as the term is defined in section 2703 of the federal "Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396w-4.

In determining the structure of health homes for chronic conditions for purposes of the federal "Patient Protection and Affordable Care Act", 42 U.S.C. sec. 1396w-4, and state plan amendments to the medicaid program, the state department shall include, to the extent permitted under federal law, provisions allowing providers of long-term care services and supports to participate as health homes or as part of a health home that provides:

Comprehensive care management;

Care coordination and health promotion;

Comprehensive transitional care;

Patient and family support;

Referral to community and social support services; and

The use of health information technology to link services, as is feasible and appropriate.

[Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b) is effective until July 1, 2024.] The health home may consist of a multi-disciplinary team, including primary care management providers, behavioral health-care providers, case managers, and providers of long-term care services and supports, including but not limited to single entry point agencies, nursing homes, alternative care facilities, day programs for the elderly, home care agencies, community mental health centers, hospice and palliative care centers, and community centered boards.

(b)

[

Editor's note: This version of subsection (3)(b) is effective July 1, 2024.

]

The health home may consist of a multi-disciplinary team, including primary care management providers, behavioral health-care providers, case managers, and providers of long-term services and supports, including but not limited to case management agencies, as defined in section 25.5-6-1702, nursing homes, alternative care facilities, day programs for the elderly, home care agencies, community mental health centers, and hospice and palliative care centers.

To the extent provided under federal law, in integrating dually eligible persons, persons with chronic conditions, or persons needing long-term care services and supports in an organization with which the state department contracts pursuant to part 4 of article 5 of this title, the state department shall permit providers of long-term services and supports to contract as health homes or to provide some or all of the services provided by the organization contracted with the state department, which services may include, but need not be limited to, navigation of primary, specialty, or long-term care supports.

Dually eligible clients may voluntarily elect to participate in a recognized medicare coordinated care system and may voluntarily elect to participate in the state department's medicaid coordinated care system.

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (SB 12-127), ch. 132, p. 453, § 1, effective April 23.

L. 2021:

(3)(b) amended, (HB 21-1187), ch. 83, p. 333, § 29, effective July 1, 2024.

25.5-6-114. Alternative care facilities - reimbursement programs - legislative declaration - report - repeal. (Repealed)

Source:

L. 2012:

Entire section added, (SB 12-128), ch. 275, p. 1452, § 1, effective August 8.

Editor's note:

Subsection (5) provided for the repeal of this section, effective July 1, 2015. (See L. 2012, p. 1452.)

25.5-6-115. Notification of federal immigration consequences.

The state department shall consult with stakeholders, including people with lived experience, immigrants rights advocates, health-care advocates, and immigration lawyers, to provide clear and accurate information and referrals regarding current public charge policies.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1289), ch. 399, p. 2844, § 19, effective June 7.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1289, see section 1 of chapter 399, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.

25.5-6-116. Community placement transformation - creation - report - repeal.

The state department shall undertake efforts to transform the state department's process for clients attempting to receive long-term care in the community.

In order to affirm Colorado's commitment to the United States supreme court's decision in Olmstead v. L.C., 527 U.S. 581 (1999), and to the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., as amended, and respond to the United States department of justice's letter of findings, dated March 3, 2022, concerning the investigation of Colorado's use of nursing facilities to serve adults with physical disabilities, the general assembly shall appropriate money to the state department in order to advance community placement and integration for individuals with disabilities.

No later than January 2023, and January 2024, the state department shall report to the joint budget committee, the house of representatives public and behavioral health and human services committee, and the senate health and human services committee, or their successor committees, as part of its "State Measurement for Accountable, Responsive, and Transparent (SMART) Government Act" hearing required by section 2-7-203. At a minimum, the report must include an analysis and recommendations on the following:

The state department's work and strategic planning regarding fulfilling Colorado's commitment to the Olmstead decision to ensure community living;

Programmatic decisions, analysis, and policy changes in accordance with the federal "Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990", 42 U.S.C. sec. 12101 et seq., as amended; and

Information regarding the state department's coordination, programmatic or medicaid benefit changes, implementation of quality oversight strategies, and metrics around community integration.

This section is repealed, effective July 1, 2025.

Source:

L. 2022:

Entire section added, (HB 22-1302), ch. 180, p. 1200, § 4, effective May 27.

Editor's note:

Section 7 of chapter 180 (HB 22-1302), Session Laws of Colorado 2022, provides that the act adding this section takes effect only if HB 22-1411 becomes law and takes effect either upon the effective date of HB 22-1302 or HB 22-1411, whichever is later. HB 22-1302 became law and took effect May 18, 2022, and HB 22-1411 became law and took effect May 27, 2022.

Cross references:

For the legislative declaration in HB 22-1302, see section 1 of chapter 180, Session Laws of Colorado 2022.